lb_LU.aff
FLAG long
PFX s0 Y 187
PFX s0 an anze/f0 an[^e]
PFX s0 an anzë/f0 anengen
PFX s0 a anze/f0 a[^nu]
PFX s0 aus ausze/f0 aus[^e]
PFX s0 ausenaner ausenanerze/f0 ausenaner
PFX s0 ausernee auserneenze/f0 ausernee[^n]
PFX s0 auserneen auserneenze/f0 auserneen
PFX s0 bauch bauchze/f0 bauch
PFX s0 blouss bloussze/f0 blouss
PFX s0 blo bloze/f0 blo[^u]
PFX s0 brooch broochze/f0 brooch
PFX s0 bäi bäize/f0 bäi
PFX s0 deel deelze/f0 deel
PFX s0 derbäi derbäize/f0 derbäi
PFX s0 dergéint dergéintze/f0 dergéint
PFX s0 dertëscht dertëschtze/f0 dertëscht
PFX s0 dertëschent dertëschentze/f0 dertëschent
PFX s0 do doze/f0 dob[el]
PFX s0 do doze/f0 dohal
PFX s0 dobäi dobäize/f0 dobäi
PFX s0 dogéint dogéintze/f0 dogéint
PFX s0 dohin dohinze/f0 dohin
PFX s0 dohi dohinze/f0 dohi[^n]
PFX s0 dotëscht dotëschtze/f0 dotëscht
PFX s0 dotëschent dotëschentze/f0 dotëschent
PFX s0 dout doutze/f0 dout
PFX s0 dran dranze/f0 dran
PFX s0 dra dranze/f0 dra[^n]
PFX s0 drop dropze/f0 drop
PFX s0 drun drunze/f0 drun
PFX s0 dru drunze/f0 dru[^n]
PFX s0 duerch duerchze/f0 duerch[^e]
PFX s0 dovun dovunze/f0 dovun
PFX s0 dervun dervunze/f0 dervun
PFX s0 dervu dervunze/f0 dervu[^n]
PFX s0 driwwer driwwerze/f0 driwwer
PFX s0 duer duerze/f0 duer[^c]
PFX s0 déck déckze/f0 déck
PFX s0 ëm ëmze/f0 ëm[^e]
PFX s0 ënner ënnerze/f0 ënner
PFX s0 entgéint entgéintze/f0 entgéint
PFX s0 era eranze/f0 era[^nu]
PFX s0 eran eranze/f0 eran
PFX s0 eraus erausze/f0 eraus[^e]
PFX s0 eraus erauszë/f0 erause
PFX s0 erbäi erbäize/f0 erbäi
PFX s0 erduerch erduerchze/f0 erduerch
PFX s0 erëm erëmze/f0 erëm[^e]
PFX s0 erëm erëmzë/f0 erëme
PFX s0 eriwwer eriwwerze/f0 eriwwer
PFX s0 erof erofze/f0 erof
PFX s0 erop eropze/f0 erop
PFX s0 eru erunze/f0 eru[^n]
PFX s0 erun erunze/f0 erun
PFX s0 dovu dovunze/f0 dovu[^n]
PFX s0 ervir ervirze/f0 ervir
PFX s0 ewech ewechze/f0 ewech
PFX s0 fäerdeg fäerdegze/f0 fäerdeg
PFX s0 feel feelze/f0 feel
PFX s0 fern fernze/f0 fern
PFX s0 fest festze/f0 fest
PFX s0 flaach flaachze/f0 flaach
PFX s0 fort fortze/f0 fort
PFX s0 fräi fräize/f0 fräi
PFX s0 frësch frëschze/f0 frësch
PFX s0 friem friemze/f0 friem
PFX s0 futti futtize/f0 futti
PFX s0 géintiwwer géintiwwerze/f0 géintiwwer
PFX s0 gerued geruedze/f0 gerued
PFX s0 gläich gläichze/f0 gläich
PFX s0 grouss groussze/f0 grouss
PFX s0 gutt guttze/f0 gutt
PFX s0 hannescht hanneschtze/f0 hannescht
PFX s0 heem heemze/f0 heem
PFX s0 helleg hellegze/f0 helleg
PFX s0 hier hierze/f0 hier
PFX s0 hin hinze/f0 hin
PFX s0 hi hinze/f0 hi[^ne]
PFX s0 héich héichze/f0 héich
PFX s0 ir irze/f0 ir
PFX s0 iwwerenee iwwereneenze/f0 iwwerenee[^n]
PFX s0 iwwereneen iwwereneenze/f0 iwwereneen
PFX s0 iwwertenee iwwerteneenze/f0 iwwertenee[^n]
PFX s0 iwwerteneen iwwerteneenze/f0 iwwerteneen
PFX s0 iwwer iwwerze/f0 iwwer[^et]
PFX s0 iwwer iwwerze/f0 iwwert[ar]
PFX s0 kal kalze/f0 kal
PFX s0 kenne kennenze/f0 kenne[^n]
PFX s0 kennen kennenze/f0 kennen
PFX s0 kleng klengze/f0 kleng
PFX s0 kloer kloerze/f0 kloer
PFX s0 krank krankze/f0 krank
PFX s0 kuerz kuerzze/f0 kuerz
PFX s0 laanscht laanschtze/f0 laanscht
PFX s0 lass lassze/f0 lass
PFX s0 leed leedze/f0 leed
PFX s0 leie leienze/f0 leie[^n]
PFX s0 leien leienze/f0 leien
PFX s0 léif léifze/f0 léif
PFX s0 mat matze/f0 mat[^e]
PFX s0 mat matzë/f0 mate
PFX s0 nei neize/f0 nei
PFX s0 néier néierze/f0 néier
PFX s0 nidder nidderze/f0 nidder
PFX s0 noeneen noeneenze/f0 noeneen
PFX s0 no noze/f0 no[^eu]
PFX s0 no nozë/f0 noe[^n]
PFX s0 of ofze/f0 of[^e]
PFX s0 op opze/f0 op[^e]
PFX s0 platt plattze/f0 platt
PFX s0 präis präisze/f0 präis
PFX s0 prett prettze/f0 prett
PFX s0 schéi schéinze/f0 schéi[^n]
PFX s0 schéin schéinze/f0 schéin
PFX s0 schlau schlauze/f0 schlau
PFX s0 schwaach schwaachze/f0 schwaach
PFX s0 sécher sécherze/f0 sécher
PFX s0 séileg séilegze/f0 séileg
PFX s0 sëtze sëtzenze/f0 sëtze[^n]
PFX s0 sëtzen sëtzenze/f0 sëtzen
PFX s0 stall stallze/f0 stall
PFX s0 statt stattze/f0 statt
PFX s0 uecht uechtze/f0 uecht
PFX s0 unenee uneneenze/f0 unenee[^n]
PFX s0 uneneen uneneenze/f0 uneneen
PFX s0 u unze/f0 u[^en]
PFX s0 un unze/f0 un[^e]
PFX s0 un unzë/f0 une[^n]
PFX s0 viraus virausze/f0 viraus
PFX s0 viru virunze/f0 viru[^n]
PFX s0 virun virunze/f0 virun
PFX s0 vir virze/f0 vir[^aue]
PFX s0 vir virzë/f0 vire
PFX s0 voll vollze/f0 voll
PFX s0 vreckt vrecktze/f0 vreckt
PFX s0 wäiss wäissze/f0 wäiss
PFX s0 wéi wéize/f0 wéi
PFX s0 weider weiderze/f0 weider[^ae]
PFX s0 weider weiderzë/f0 weidere
PFX s0 wouer wouerze/f0 wouer
PFX s0 wuel wuelze/f0 wuel
PFX s0 zefridde zefriddenze/f0 zefridde[^n]
PFX s0 zefridden zefriddenze/f0 zefridden
PFX s0 zeréck zeréckze/f0 zeréck[^e]
PFX s0 zeréck zeréckzë/f0 zerécke
PFX s0 zesumme zesummenze/f0 zesumme[^n]
PFX s0 zesummen zesummenze/f0 zesummen
PFX s0 zou zouze/f0 zou[^e]
PFX s0 zou zouzë/f0 zoue
PFX s0 zréck zréckze/f0 zréck[^e]
PFX s0 zréck zréckzë/f0 zrécke
PFX s0 noenee noeneenze/f0 noenee[^n]
PFX s0 schif schifze/f0 schif
PFX s0 dozou dozouze/f0 dozou
PFX s0 do doze/f0 doloo
PFX s0 donieft donieftze/f0 donieft
PFX s0 doduerch doduerchze/f0 doduerch
PFX s0 dernieft dernieftze/f0 dernieft
PFX s0 derniewent derniewentze/f0 derniewent
PFX s0 doheem doheemze/f0 doheem
PFX s0 dowidder dowidderze/f0 dowidder
PFX s0 dofir dofirze/f0 dofir
PFX s0 dohanner dohannerze/f0 dohanner
PFX s0 do doze/f0 dohunn
PFX s0 do doze/f0 dostoen
PFX s0 derzou derzouze/f0 derzou
PFX s0 kapott kapottze/f0 kapott
PFX s0 déif déifze/f0 déif
PFX s0 derhanner derhannerze/f0 derhanner[^t]
PFX s0 derhannert derhannertze/f0 derhannert
PFX s0 riicht riichtze/f0 riicht
PFX s0 ronn ronnze/f0 ronn
PFX s0 waarm waarmze/f0 waarm
PFX s0 anenee aneneenze/f0 anenee[^n]
PFX s0 ëm ëmzë/f0 ëme
PFX s0 ronderëm ronderëmze/f0 ronderëm
PFX s0 duerchernee duercherneenze/f0 duerchernee[^n]
PFX s0 bereet bereetze/f0 bereet
PFX s0 tësche tëschenze/f0 tësche[^n]
PFX s0 hei heize/f0 hei
PFX s0 op opzë/f0 ope
PFX s0 of ofzë/f0 ofe
PFX s0 nout noutze/f0 nout
PFX s0 eidel eidelze/f0 eidel
PFX s0 vir virze/f0 vira[hn]
PFX s0 dréche dréchenze/f0 dréche
PFX s0 out outze/f0 out

SFX I0 N 23
SFX I0 ach ächen/f0 ach is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 mann fra/n0 mann is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 ach ächin/n2 ach is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 ach ächen/f0 ach is:feminine is:singular is:plural
SFX I0 ënz inzessin/n2 ënz is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 boy girl/n0 boy is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 ek igin/n2 ek is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 ott ëttin/n2 ott is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 dd ttesch/n0 add is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 -duc e-duchesse/N0 -duc is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 -Duc e-Duchesse/N0 -Duc is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 jong meedchen/d0 jong is:neutral is:singular
SFX I0 f win/n2 if is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 o a/n0 o is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 udd iddin/n2 udd is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 of äfin/n2 of is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 udd üddin/n2 udd is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 ous éisin/n2 ous is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 papp mamm/n0 papp is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 p m/n0 [Bb]op is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 pi mi/n0 opi is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 pa ma/n0 opa is:feminine is:singular
SFX I0 oopst eepstin/n2 oopst is:feminine is:singular

SFX P1 N 21
SFX P1 ten s aapten
SFX P1 en 0 aapten
SFX P1 n 0 behaapten
SFX P1 auchen äichten/f0 auchen
SFX P1 auchen äichs auchen
SFX P1 auchen äicht auchen
SFX P1 ëssen oussten/f0 ëssen
SFX P1 ëssen ousst ëssen
SFX P1 ëssen eess ëssen
SFX P1 ëssen ësst ëssen
SFX P1 ëssen éissten/f0 ëssen
SFX P1 ëssen éisst ëssen
SFX P1 ngen ingen/V0 schéngen
SFX P1 ngen ing schéngen
SFX P1 uelen éilen/V0 huelen
SFX P1 uelen éil huelen
SFX P1 wen wt wen
SFX P1 wen ws wen
SFX P1 wen w wen
SFX P1 wen we wen
SFX P1 n 0 ëssen

SFX T1 N 3
SFX T1 dchen tercher dchen is:plural
SFX T1 nchen tercher nchen is:plural
SFX T1 n 0 . is:eifeler

SFX F9 N 2
SFX F9 0 fin/n2 f is:feminine is:singular
SFX F9 k kin/n2 k is:feminine is:singular

SFX s1 N 1
SFX s1 0 s/!0 .

SFX n2 N 2
SFX n2 0 nen . is:plural
SFX n2 0 ne . is:plural is:eifeler
