lb_LU.dic
akesselen/V0s0 po:verb
Aktivitéit/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
antauschen/V0s0 po:verb
ausblosen/P0s0 po:verb
ausrappen/V0s0 po:verb
bäilafen/P0s0 po:verb
Ballerino/n0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bensin/s1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bëschdéif/t0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bestëmmung/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Bopi/n0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
brauchen/V0v0G0P1 po:verb
Campingschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Chefkach/e0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Corpschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Déif/t0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Demandeur/n0F1s1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Diplomatiechef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Distributioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
dotëschtkommen/P0s0 po:verb
duerchhuelen/P0s0 po:verb
duerchschéngen/V0s0P1 po:verb
Duerchschnëtt/s1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Duerfjong/n0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Emissioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
ëmknécken/w0s0 po:verb
Equippechef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
erakréien/P0s0 po:verb
eraschéngen/V0s0P1 po:verb
erausrëtschen/V0s0 po:verb
erofbréngen/P0s0 po:verb
erschéngen/V0v0P1 po:verb
eruschmeechelen/V0s0 po:verb
Europachef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Exmann/u0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fluchsécherung/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
fortdoen/P0s0 po:verb
Fouermann/u0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fraktiounschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fuerschung/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Geméismann/u0T0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gewerkschaftschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gott/u0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Grof/n0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hallefgott/u0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Heckefransous/n0F6I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
hiriichten/V0s0 po:verb
Houfschmadd/t0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Immigratioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Indianerchef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Informatioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
interviewen/P1 po:verb
Iwwerwaachung/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kach/e0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Katholik/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kichejong/n0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kommunikatioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kommunikatiounschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kremlchef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Krounprënz/n0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Leeschtung/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
matspillen/V0s0 po:verb
Militärchef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mobilitéit/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Nopeschjong/n0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ofbéien/V0s0 po:verb
ofpicken/V0s0 po:verb
ofzocken/V0s0 po:verb
Olympionik/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
opbrauchen/V0s0P1 po:verb
oppëtzen/V0s0 po:verb
Orchesterchef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Päerd/K0s1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Parlamentschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Personalchef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Postchef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Privatmann/u0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Promotioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Rebellechef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Redaktioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Relioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Reliounschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Revolutiounschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Richtung/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Schëff/R0K0X0s1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
schéngen/V0s0P1 po:verb
Sécherheetschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sektiounschef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sonnekinnek/n0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Spëndchen/T1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Spënnchen/T1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Superkach/e0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Teamchef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Televisioun/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
tëschelanden/V0s0 po:verb
uneekelen/V0s0 po:verb
Urgroussbop/n0I0T2D9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Verdeelung/n0s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
virahnen/V0s0 po:verb
weiderexistéieren/V0s0 po:verb
wëssen/P1 po:verb
Zammermann/u0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
zesummefueren/P0s0 po:verb
zouschéissen/V0s0 po:verb
